District of Columbia statutes.
44-1505

Police to arrest law violators at request of member; evidence of membership.

Members of the Metropolitan Police force of the District of Columbia, upon application of a member of the Washington Humane Society who has viewed a violation of a law or regulation of the District for the prevention of cruelty to animals, shall arrest the offending party without a warrant, and take him before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for trial. Proper evidence of membership to a police officer shall be the exhibition of a badge or certificate of membership in the Society.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 5
R.S., D.C., § 998
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1196, ch. 854, § 43
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 618, Pub. L. 88-241, § 12
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

History

Animal cruelty, warrantless arrest, fighting or baiting, see § 22-1009.
Animal cruelty, warrantless arrest, notice to owner, see § 22-1004.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 22-1004 and § 22-1009.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 32-905.
1973 Ed., § 32-205.

Prior Codifications